District of Columbia statutes.
50-1507.03

Registration.

(a)

The Mayor shall implement a program for owners and apportioned operators to obtain apportioned registrations for their fleets as promulgated under the IRP.

(b)

Any vehicle qualifying for IRP and that the lists the District of Columbia as the established place of business must declare the District of Columbia as its base jurisdiction for purpose of the IRP and obtain a base plate from the District of Columbia.

(c)

Vehicles qualifying for the IRP and engaged in interjurisdictional movement, but not apportioned or covered by reciprocity, shall acquire a trip permit prior to entering the District of Columbia.

(d)

Trucks and truck tractors, combinations of vehicles having a combined gross vehicle weight of 26,000 pounds or less may be proportionally registered at the option of the registrant.

(e)

At no point during operation, shall the gross weight of a vehicle registered pursuant to this subchapter, or of the combination of vehicles of which the vehicle is a part, exceed the gross weight on the basis of which it is registered.

(f)

Any owner or apportioned operator who fails to comply with subsection (b), (c) or (e) of this section shall be punished by a fine of not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01 or jailed not longer than 180 days, or both, for each violation. In addition, a police officer may impound the vehicle until a valid registration or a trip permit is obtained.

Sept. 5, 1997, D.C. Law 12-14, § 4, 44 DCR 3620
Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-289, § 202, 48 DCR 2057
Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-279, § 404, 54 DCR 903
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 269, 60 DCR 2064
This section is referenced in § 50-1401.02 and § 50-1501.02.
1981 Ed., § 40-123.
D.C. Law 13-289 added subsecs. (e) and (f).
D.C. Law 16-279, in subsec. (d), deleted “and buses used in transportation of chartered parties” following “or less” following “pounds or less”.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “of not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01” for “not to exceed $500” in (f).
See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 50-1507.01.
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 269 of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).
Delegation of Authority to the Director of the Department of Motor Vehicles to Implement the International Registration Plan, see Mayor’s Order 2005-21, January 25, 2005 ( 52 DCR 2841).
Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.